Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB679.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 135. Minimum Hourly Wage or Living Wage for Education Support Professionals.--(a) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year:(1) An education support professional shall be paid a minimum hourly wage of not less than twenty dollars ($20) per hour or the living wage determined under subsection (f), 123456789101112131415161718192021 whichever is greater.(2) For overtime hours, an education support professional shall be paid not less than one and one-half (1 1/2) times the amount that the education support professional is paid under paragraph (1).(3) For an education support professional paid on a salaried basis, salary shall be compared to hours worked in two-week periods to ensure that the education support professional is paid not less than required under this section.(b) This section shall not be construed to require the modification, renegotiation or reopening of an agreement or employment contract in effect on the effective date of this subsection. Subject to subsection (c), the salary schedule or any other terms of the agreement or employment contract are not superseded or modified by this section.(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), beginning in the 2025-2026 school year and during the term of any agreement or employment contract in effect on the effective date of this subsection, through and including the 2029-2030 school year, a public school entity shall make a supplemental wage payment to each education support professional who is entitled to a wage that is lower than the minimum hourly wage or living wage required under subsection (a). The supplemental wage payment shall be in an amount equal to the number of hours worked by the education support professional during the school year multiplied by the difference between the minimum hourly wage or living wage required under subsection (a) and the lower wage to which the education support professional is entitled under the terms of the agreement or employment contract in effect on the effective date of this section, which shall not be lower than the wage 20250SB0679PN0678 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that the education support professional received for the immediately preceding school year.(d) A public school entity shall be entitled to receive a payment under subsection (g) if the public school entity:(1) makes a supplemental wage payment under subsection (c) in any school year from 2025-2026 through 2029-2030, inclusive;(2) on or after the effective date of this subsection, enters into an agreement or employment contract meeting the requirements of subsection (e) for the 2025-2026 school year; or(3) is operating under a period of status quo during the 2025-2026 school year following the expiration of an agreement.(e) An employment contract or an agreement negotiated by a public school entity and an employe organization under the Public Employe Relations Act, on or after the effective date of this subsection, shall not provide for a wage lower than provided for under subsection (a). A provision in an agreement or employment contract in effect on the effective date of this section that provides for a wage in conflict with subsection (a) shall be discontinued in a new or renewed agreement or employment contract or during the period of status quo following the expiration of an agreement.(f) The following apply regarding the living wage:(1) Within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this paragraph, the Department of Labor and Industry shall:(i) Determine the living wage applicable to each public school entity in this Commonwealth.(ii) Post the living wage described in subparagraph (i) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Department of Labor and Industry.(2) Beginning one year after the effective date of this 20250SB0679PN0678 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph, and each year thereafter, the Department of Labor and Industry shall:(i) Adjust the living wage described under paragraph (1)(i) upward if there has been a positive percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: All Items (CPI-U) for the United States City Average as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the previous twelve-month period.(ii) Post the adjusted living wage described in subparagraph (i) on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Department of Labor and Industry.(g) The following apply to supplemental reimbursements and special payments regarding wage increases for education support professionals:(1) Each public school entity making supplemental wage payments as provided for under subsection (c) shall receive supplemental reimbursement payments or special payments from the Department of Education in amounts, on dates and in a manner determined by the Department of Education.(2) The reconciled amount of the payments for any school year from 2025-2026 through 2029-2030, inclusive, shall be paid to the public school entity in each school year thereafter.(3) Payment under this subsection shall be in addition to any other amount payable to the public school entity.(4) For a school district, the total net, reconciled amount of supplemental reimbursements that the school district receives shall be included in the school district's allocation amount under section 2502.56(b)(1).(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if a public school entity enters into a contract for 20250SB0679PN0678 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 noninstructional services with a third party under section 528 on or after the effective date of this paragraph, the public school entity shall permanently forfeit an amount equal to the payment received by the public school entity under this subsection multiplied by the number of public school employe positions eliminated due to the public school entity's decision to enter into the contract with a third party under section 528. The following apply:(i) The Department of Education shall determine the amount forfeited.(ii) In the case of a school district, the amount forfeited shall be permanently removed from the school district's allocation amount under section 2502.56(b)(1).(6) The Department of Education shall issue guidelines necessary for the implementation and administration of this subsection.(h) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agreement." A contract or agreement between a public employer and a public employe or employe organization under the Public Employe Relations Act."Education support professional." An individual who is not any of the following:(1) A professional employe, as defined in section 1101(1).(2) A substitute, as defined in section 1101(2).(3) A temporary professional employe, as defined in section 1101(3)."Employe organization." As defined in section 301(3) of the Public Employe Relations Act.20250SB0679PN0678 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Employment contract." A contract for services between a public school entity and one or more education support professionals who are not members of a bargaining unit represented by an employe organization."Living wage." The minimum income necessary for an education support professional to meet basic needs based upon the region of this Commonwealth in which the education support professional is employed."Minimum hourly wage." A rate of pay of twenty dollars ($20) per hour."Public employe." As defined in section 301(2) of the Public Employe Relations Act."Public Employe Relations Act." The act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the "Public Employe Relations Act.""Public employer." As defined in section 301(1) of the Public Employe Relations Act."Public school entity." A school district, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2. Section 508 of the act is amended to read:Section 508. Majority Vote Required; Recording.--(a) The affirmative vote of a majority of all the members of the board of school directors in every school district, duly recorded, showing how each member voted, shall be required in order to take action on the following subjects:--Fixing length of school term.Adopting textbooks.Appointing or dismissing district superintendents, assistant district superintendents, associate superintendents, principals, and teachers.Appointing tax collectors and other appointees.20250SB0679PN0678 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Adopting the annual budget.Levying and assessing taxes.Purchasing, selling, or condemning land.Locating new buildings or changing the locations of old ones.Dismissing a teacher after a hearing.Creating or increasing any indebtedness.Adopting courses of study.Establishing additional schools or departments.Designating depositories for school funds.Entering into contracts of any kind, including contracts for the purchase of fuel or any supplies, where the amount involved exceeds one hundred dollars ($100).Fixing salaries or compensation of officers, teachers, or other appointees of the board of school directors.Entering into contracts with and making appropriations to the intermediate unit for the district's proportionate share of the cost of services provided or to be provided for by the intermediate unit.(b) A board of school directors may not enter into a contract for services to be provided by an education support professional, as the term is defined in section 135(h), that provides for payment of a wage of less than required under section 135(a). The following apply to contracts:(1) A provision in a contract in effect on the effective date of this subsection that provides for a salary or fee in conflict with this subsection shall be discontinued in a new or renewed contract.(2) This subsection shall not be construed to require the modification, renegotiation or reopening of a contract in effect on the effective date of this subsection, and neither the salary 20250SB0679PN0678 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 schedule nor any other terms of the contract are superseded or modified by this subsection.(c) Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall render [such] the acts of the board of school directors void and [unenforcible] unenforceable.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0679PN0678 - 8 - 123456